Utah statutes.
23-19-2.   License and certificate forms prescribed by Wildlife Board.

(1)  The Wildlife Board shall prescribe the form of license or certificate of registration to be used for hunting, fishing, trapping, seining, and dealing in furs.

(2)  Any license issued pursuant to Section 23-19-36 shall be designated as such by a code number and shall contain no reference to the licensee's disability.



Amended by Chapter 128, 1999 General Session

